Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2322
Excavator; notice to center.

An excavator shall serve notice of intent to excavate upon the center by submitting a locate request using a method provided by the center. The center shall inform the excavator of all operators to whom such notice will be transmitted and shall promptly transmit such notice to every operator having an underground facility in the area of intended excavation. The notice shall be transmitted to operators and excavators as a ticket. The center shall assign an identification number to each notice received, which number shall be evidenced on the ticket.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 22;

Laws 2014, LB736, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB462, § 12.